Washington statutes.
RCW 39.50.030

Issuance of short-term obligations—Procedure—Interest rate—Contracts for future sale.

(1) The issuance of short-term obligations shall be authorized by ordinance of the governing body which ordinance shall fix the maximum amount of the obligations to be issued or, if applicable, the maximum amount which may be outstanding at any time, the maximum term and interest rate or rates to be borne thereby, the manner of sale, maximum price, form including bearer or registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030, terms, conditions, and the covenants thereof. For those municipalities and taxing and assessment districts for which the county treasurer is not the designated treasurer by law, the ordinance may provide for designation and employment of a paying agent for the short-term obligations and may authorize a designated representative of the municipal corporation, subject to the terms of the ordinance in selling and delivering short-term obligations authorized and fixing the dates, price, interest rates, and other details as may be specified in the ordinance. For the county and those taxing and assessment districts for which the county treasurer is the designated treasurer by law or other appointment, the county treasurer shall be notified thirty days in advance of borrowing under this chapter and will be the designated paying agent to act on its behalf for all payments of principal, interest, and penalties for that obligation, subject to the terms of the ordinance in selling and delivering short-term obligations authorized and fixing the dates, price, interest rates, and other details as may be specified in the ordinance. Short-term obligations issued under this section shall bear such fixed or variable rate or rates of interest as the governing body considers to be in the best interests of the municipal corporation. Variable rates of interest may be fixed in relationship to such standard or index as the governing body designates.

The governing body may make contracts for the future sale of short-term obligations pursuant to which the purchasers are committed to purchase the short-term obligations from time to time on the terms and conditions stated in the contract, and may pay such consideration as it considers proper for the commitments. Short-term obligations issued in anticipation of the receipt of taxes shall be paid within six months from the end of the fiscal year in which they are issued. For the purpose of this subsection, short-term obligations issued in anticipation of the sale of general obligation bonds shall not be considered to be obligations issued in anticipation of the receipt of taxes.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such short-term obligations may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2001 c 299 s 17; 1995 c 38 s 9; 1994 c 301 s 13; 1985 c 71 s 1; 1983 c 167 s 112; 1982 c 216 s 4.]

NOTES:

Acts of municipal officers ratified and confirmed—1995 c 38: See note following RCW 3.02.045.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.